dev/adjective/adjective.ne.dix
  <!-- कान्छो; कान्छ; 3 -->
    <pardef n="कान्छ/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कल्चुडो; कल्चुड; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कल्चुड/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सरकारी; सरकारी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सरकारी__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खुला; खुला; 1 -->
    <pardef n="खुला__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उच्च; उच्च; 3 -->
    <pardef n="उच्च__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>तर</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>तम</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पाल्नुभो; पाल्नुभो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पाल्नुभो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विदुषी; विदुषी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विदुषी__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मसिनो; मसिन; 3 -->
    <pardef n="मसिन/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा-मसिना</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- टाढो; टाढो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="टाढो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आधारित; आधारित; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आधारित__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पहेंलो; पहे; 3 -->
    <pardef n="पहे/ंलो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ंलो</l>
          <r>ंलो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ंला</l>
          <r>ंलो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ला</l>
          <r>ंलो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दुःखलाग्दो; दुःखलाग्दो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दुःखलाग्दो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- घिनलाग्दो; घिनलाग्द; 1 -->
    <pardef n="घिनलाग्द/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मोटो; मोट; 4 -->
    <pardef n="मोट/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ामोटा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा-मोटा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सम्पूर्ण; सम्पूर्ण; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सम्पूर्ण__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- राष्ट्रिय; राष्ट्रिय; 1 -->
    <pardef n="राष्ट्रिय__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अभागि; अभागि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अभागि__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नी</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जिभ्रो; जिभ्रो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जिभ्रो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भोट; भोट; 2 -->
    <pardef n="भोट__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ीनी</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िनी</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वल्लो; वल्लो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वल्लो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सबै; सबै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सबै__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लमिनी; लमिनी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लमिनी__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मूलढो; मूलढो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मूलढो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नाम्लो; नाम्लो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नाम्लो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लाम्चो; लाम्चो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लाम्चो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- शुरु; शुरु; 1 -->
    <pardef n="शुरु__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रथम; प्रथम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रथम__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="qnt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ओटा; ओटा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ओटा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="qnt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सानो-ठूलो; सान; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सान/ो-ठूलो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा-ठूला</l>
          <r>ो-ठूलो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खस्रो; खस्र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="खस्र/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बिरानो; बिरानो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बिरानो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पीरो; पीरो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पीरो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तयारी; तयारी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तयारी__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दैनिक; दैनिक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दैनिक__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फूर्तिलो; फूर्तिलो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फूर्तिलो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जूठो; जूठो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जूठो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नीलो; नीलो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नीलो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="कान्छो"><i>कान्छ</i><par n="कान्छ/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कल्चुडो"><i>कल्चुड</i><par n="कल्चुड/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सरकारी"><i>सरकारी</i><par n="सरकारी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="खुला"><i>खुला</i><par n="खुला__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="उच्च"><i>उच्च</i><par n="उच्च__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पाल्नुभो"><i>पाल्नुभो</i><par n="पाल्नुभो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="विदुषी"><i>विदुषी</i><par n="विदुषी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मसिनो"><i>मसिन</i><par n="मसिन/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="टाढो"><i>टाढो</i><par n="टाढो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="आधारित"><i>आधारित</i><par n="आधारित__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पहेंलो"><i>पहे</i><par n="पहे/ंलो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="दुःखलाग्दो"><i>दुःखलाग्दो</i><par n="दुःखलाग्दो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="घिनलाग्दो"><i>घिनलाग्द</i><par n="घिनलाग्द/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मोटो"><i>मोट</i><par n="मोट/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सम्पूर्ण"><i>सम्पूर्ण</i><par n="सम्पूर्ण__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="राष्ट्रिय"><i>राष्ट्रिय</i><par n="राष्ट्रिय__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अभागि"><i>अभागि</i><par n="अभागि__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="जिभ्रो"><i>जिभ्रो</i><par n="जिभ्रो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="भोट"><i>भोट</i><par n="भोट__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="वल्लो"><i>वल्लो</i><par n="वल्लो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सबै"><i>सबै</i><par n="सबै__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="लमिनी"><i>लमिनी</i><par n="लमिनी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मूलढो"><i>मूलढो</i><par n="मूलढो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नाम्लो"><i>नाम्लो</i><par n="नाम्लो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="लाम्चो"><i>लाम्चो</i><par n="लाम्चो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="शुरु"><i>शुरु</i><par n="शुरु__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रथम"><i>प्रथम</i><par n="प्रथम__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ओटा"><i>ओटा</i><par n="ओटा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सानो-ठूलो"><i>सान</i><par n="सान/ो-ठूलो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="खस्रो"><i>खस्र</i><par n="खस्र/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बिरानो"><i>बिरानो</i><par n="बिरानो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पीरो"><i>पीरो</i><par n="पीरो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="तयारी"><i>तयारी</i><par n="तयारी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="दैनिक"><i>दैनिक</i><par n="दैनिक__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="फूर्तिलो"><i>फूर्तिलो</i><par n="फूर्तिलो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="जूठो"><i>जूठो</i><par n="जूठो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नीलो"><i>नीलो</i><par n="नीलो__adj"/></e>
